Utah statutes.
78A-6-323.   Additional finding at adjudication hearing -- Petition -- Court
records.
(1)  Upon the filing with the court of a petition under Section 78A-6-304 by
the Division of Child and Family Services or any interested person informing
the court, among other things, that the division has made a supported finding
that a person committed a severe type of child abuse or neglect as defined in
Section 62A-4a-1002, the court shall:
(a)  make a finding of substantiated, unsubstantiated, or without merit;
(b)  include the finding described in Subsection (1)(a) in a written order;
and
(c)  deliver a certified copy of the order described in Subsection (1)(b) to
the division.
(2)  The judicial finding under Subsection (1) shall be made:
(a)  as part of the adjudication hearing;
(b)  at the conclusion of the adjudication hearing; or
(c)  as part of a court order entered pursuant to a written stipulation of the
parties.
(3) (a)  Any person described in Subsection 62A-4a-1010(1) may at any time
file with the court a petition for removal of the person's name from the
Licensing Information System.
(b)  At the conclusion of the hearing on the petition, the court shall:
(i)  make a finding of substantiated, unsubstantiated, or without merit;
(ii)  include the finding described in Subsection (1)(a) in a written order;
and
(iii)  deliver a certified copy of the order described in Subsection (1)(b) to
the division.
(4)  A proceeding for adjudication of a supported finding under this section
of a type of abuse or neglect that does not constitute a severe type of child
abuse or neglect may be joined in the juvenile court with an adjudication of a
severe type of child abuse or neglect.
(5)  If a person whose name appears on the Licensing Information system prior
to May 6, 2002 files a petition during the time that an alleged perpetrator's
application for clearance to work with children or vulnerable adults is
pending, the court shall hear the matter and enter a final decision no later
than 60 days after the filing of the petition.
(6)  For the purposes of licensing under Sections 26-21-9.5, 26-39-402,
62A-1-118, and for the purposes described in Section 62A-2-121:
(a)  the court shall make available records of its findings under Subsections
(1) and (2) for licensing purposes, only to those with statutory authority to
access also the Licensing Information System created under Section 62A-
4a-1006; and
(b)  any appellate court shall make available court records of appeals from
juvenile court decisions under Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) for
licensing purposes, only to those with statutory authority to access also the
Licensing Information System.
